


Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking


































































































In global custody and fund administration business, we use our network of overseas subsidiaries to provide a full range of value-added services, including securities lending and overseas forex dealing services.



In the asset management business, we strive to stably invest valuable entrusted client assets, including corporate pensions, public pensions, public funds, and surplus funds of financial institutions and companies.



We provide real estate services for corporate clients and investors including brokerage, real estate appraisal, real estate trust and custodian services, property management and real estate securitization arrangement and real estate asset management.



We perform complex stock administration tasks on behalf of issuing companies. These tasks include overseas stock administration and JDR (Japan Depositary Receipt) issuance.





MUTB is a core operating company of Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group (MUFG).




As one of the core companies of the Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group, Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation provides its customers ...







MUTB provides its clients with a full range of high-quality financial services, including various commercial banking services, as well as asset management and administration, real estate, and stock transfer agency services.



Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group (MUFG) is one of the world's largest and most diversified financial groups. The Group has the largest overseas network of any Japanese financial group, comprising offices and subsidiaries, including Union Bank, in more than 40 countries.








































Site map  |  Contact us  |  Terms & Conditions
USA PATRIOT Act Certification
Personal information Protection Policy
Important Information about Accounts in the U.S.


Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation
						Director of Kanto Local Finance Bureau ( Registered Financial Institutions ) No.33
						Associations in which a Member:
						Japan Securities Dealers Association
						The Financial Futures Association of Japan



Copyright ©  Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation All rights reserved.












Press Release : Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking










































Home
Press Release



Press Release




May. 15, 2017
Functional Realignment of Group Subsidiaries (236KB)



Feb. 10, 2017
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation to recapitalize Luxembourg subsidiaries (126KB)



Oct. 5, 2016
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation completes acquisition of Rydex Fund Services, LLC (285KB)



Jul. 29, 2016
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation to acquire Rydex Fund Services, LLC (208KB)



Jun. 15, 2016
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation Forms Business Alliance with Yuanta Securities Investment Trust Company, Taiwan, and STOXX Limited, Switzerland (230KB)



May. 30, 2016
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation Opens a Representative Office in Dubai International Financial Centre (DIFC) (231KB)



May. 6, 2016
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation completes acquisition of Capital Analytics II LLC (261KB)



Feb. 4, 2016
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation to acquire Capital Analytics II LLC (216KB)



Jan. 29, 2016
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Announces New President and CEO, Chairman (84KB)



Aug. 4, 2015
Joint development of smart-beta indices with STOXX Limited, Switzerland   - First index for joint development is linked Japanese stocks with "high ROE" (163KB)



Sep. 24, 2013
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation Completes the Aquisition of Butterfield Fulcrum Group (68KB)



Jun. 21, 2013
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation to Acquire Butterfield Fulcrum Group (36KB)



Mar. 1, 2012
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation Makes AMP Capital Holdings Limited an Affiliated Company Accounted for by the Equity Method (76KB)



Jan. 31, 2012
Changes of Directors (30KB)



Dec. 9, 2011
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation enters into strategic capital and business alliance with AMP Capital Holdings Limited (15KB)



Jul. 29, 2011
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation Provides ETN-JDR Services, First in Japan ~Expanding Listed Trust Business~ (122KB)



Apr. 6, 2011
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation Dispatches Directors to Chinese Asset Management Company SWS MU Fund Management Co., Ltd., ad Makes it an Affiliated Company Accounted for by the Equity Method (15KB)



Sep. 7, 2010
Investment in SYWG BNP Paribas Asset Management (14KB)



Nov. 27, 2009
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation sends a non-executive director to the Board of Aberdeen Asset Management PLC (42KB)



Oct. 7, 2008
Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group, Inc. Obtains Financial Holding Company Status in the United States (30KB)



Oct. 2, 2008
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation enters into strategic capital and business alliance with Aberdeen Asset Management PLC (83KB)



Jun. 2, 2008
MUTB Forms Business Alliance With First Hawaiian Bank on Probate and Estate Settlement Services for U.S. Assets (17KB)



May. 1, 2008
MUFG Strengthens Group Global Custody Business (11KB)



Feb. 26, 2008
Business Alliance between Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking and Union Bank of California in U.S. Asset Estate Services (22KB)



May. 2, 2007
MUTB Forms Business Alliance with Northern Trust on Probate and Estate Settlement Services for U.S. Assets (131KB)



Feb. 14, 2007
MUFG to Strengthen Global Custody Business (82KB)



Sep. 13, 2005
Establishment of a Joint Venture Company with Computershare Limited (22KB)





Return to Top of Page















Terms & Conditions : Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking










































Home
Terms & Conditions



Terms & Conditions

This website is operated by Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation (hereafter "MUTB") or agents of MUTB. Please read these terms and conditions carefully before using the website. By accessing this website and any pages thereof, you agree to be bound by the terms and conditions below. If you do not agree to the terms and conditions below, please do not access this website, or any pages thereof. We reserve the right, at our discretion, to change, modify, add, or remove portions of these terms and conditions at any time without prior notification. Please check these terms and conditions periodically for changes.
The contents of this website were prepared for the purpose of providing general information concerning Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation to institutional investors and institutional investment industry consultants.
The contents are not, and should not be construed as, an offer or the solicitation of an offer to buy or sell any securities or financial products.
1. Disclaimer about Forward-Looking Statements
Information on this website may contain forward-looking statements with respect to the financial condition, results of operations and businesses of MUTB. These forward-looking statements involve certain risks and uncertainties that may result from changes in MUTB's operational environment.
2. Insider Trading
MUTB posts press releases on this website to facilitate timely disclosure of information to its shareholders, investors, customers, and other stakeholders. The press releases may contain "material facts" defined in Article 166(1) of the Financial Instruments and Exchange Act, concerning the business of MUTB. In the case that a person who receives such information by viewing this website conducts any sale, purchase or certain other transaction designated under the Financial Instruments and Exchange Act in respect to stocks or certain other securities or instruments issued by MUTB, within 12 hours of disclosure to the designated media, such conduct may be deemed to be a violation of this Act.
3. Copyright
Copyright to the contents of this website (including but not limited to all information, brands and designs) are owned by MUTB or its affiliated companies involved in the operation of the website. They may not be used, copied or altered without the prior express consent of MUTB.
4. Change in MUFG Site Contents
We reserve the right to suspend operation of, or change, the contents of this website at any time without prior notification.
5. Privacy
MUTB protects personal information submitted to this website in accordance with MUTB's Personal Information Protection Policy.
6. Security
MUTB continuously strives to enhance its website security measures to prevent unauthorized access to, or the loss, destruction, alteration, and unauthorized disclosure of customer information.
Measures include
(1) Information entered on the MUTB site is encrypted during transmission by Security Socket Layer (SSL) software.
(2) MUTB applies industry standard practices including "firewalls" which block unauthorized access, in order to safeguard the confidentiality of customer information.
(3) Appropriate virus alert programs are installed on our computers.
7. Limitation of Liability
In no event will MUTB be liable for any troubles, damages or losses arising from the use of this website or any information contained within it. Furthermore, in no event will MUTB be liable for any troubles, damages or losses arising from the interruption or suspension of the operation of this website, or from changes to the information and materials contained herein.
8. Cookies
In order to enhance security and to provide customized information, this website uses cookies, which are small data structures used to store data on personal computers and to return information to this websites.Please be advised that cookies used by MUTB do not contain any identifiable personal information.
9. Links
(1) Links to websites offered by third parties
This website may contain links to or banners for websites provided and controlled by third parties. As we are not operating those websites, MUTB accepts no liability for any information offered at any third party website linked from this website. 
(2) Linking to this website
With regards to linking to this website, please comply with all of the instructions set forth below. In no event will MUTB be liable for any troubles, damages or losses arising from linking to this website. 
i) The URL for use in links should be one of the following:
http://www.tr.mufg.jphttp://www.tr.mufg.jp/english/Direct links to other pages are prohibited.
ii) Links that display the contents of this website as part of the linking website using frames or other techniques are prohibited due to the possibility of errors occurring. Please utilize only links that open a new window or transfer the viewer to this website. 
iii) Links to this website should be used only for the purpose of convenience to those visiting the linking site. Implying a special relationship with MUTB or utilizing the links as a sales point for commercial gain is strictly forbidden. 
iv) Links that may harm social trust in MUTB or may cause any economic loss to MUTB are forbidden. Offensive or illegal links will not be allowed.
v) In addition, any link that acts in a similar way to those listed as prohibited above will also be prohibited. 
10. Recommended Settings for Viewing the MUTB Site
Use of one of the following Internet browsers is recommended for viewing this website: Internet Explorer 9.0 or higher
11. Applicable Laws and Jurisdiction
These terms and conditions are governed by and construed in accordance with laws of Japan unless expressly provided otherwise. All controversies and disputes arising out of or relating to these terms and conditions will be submitted to the Tokyo District Court in Tokyo, Japan, as the court of first instance.

Return to Top of Page















About MUTB : Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking










































Home
About MUTB



About MUTB


Information about MUTB

Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking (MUTB) was established in 1927, and has been in business for approximately 100 years. MUTB is a wholly owned subsidiary of MUFG and a core MUFG company. With total assets of 45.7 trillion yen as of March 31, 2016, it is one of Japan's largest trust banks. 
Besides operations in Japan, MUTB serves customers to pursue its global business through a worldwide network of branches and subsidiaries in Asia, Europe and the United States. As Japan's major trust bank, MUTB offers high-quality and comprehensive financial services for customers, which include various commercial banking services as well as asset management and administration, real estate, and stock transfer agency services.
Our goal is to be "A truly reliable trust bank." We have firmly grasped the needs of our customers and society to provide timely, high quality products and services through our expertise as a trust bank.









As one of the core companies of the Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group, Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation ...
Company Name Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation Management Mikio Ikegaya, President ...
MUTB's Corporate Vision conforms to MUFG policies. Please see MUFG's website for ...







MUTB has an "in-house company" model of management based on six business units  ...
MUTB's strengths lie in its consulting capability combining trust functions with banking ...
MUTB addresses the needs of its customers on a global basis through its strategic ...







Statement of IncomeBalance Sheets
We aim to help realize a sustainable society, while fulfilling our inherent mission ...
The Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Report 2016 was newly introduced ...



Return to Top of Page












﻿

























Avon Products, Inc. (AVP) Stake Lowered by Prescott Group Capital Management L.L.C. - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for Avon Products Inc.
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Avon Products Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Zacks: Brokerages Anticipate Sunoco Logistics Partners LP (ETP) to Announce $0.15 Earnings Per Share
Alimentation Couche Tard Inc (ATD.B) PT Raised to C$73.00 at National Bank Financial
Go-Ahead Group plc (LON:GOG) Price Target Cut to GBX 1,900
Deutsche Bank AG Reaffirms “Sell” Rating for Chipotle Mexican Grill, Inc. (NYSE:CMG)
Sse Plc (LON:SSE) Given “Sell” Rating at Deutsche Bank AG
AR Asset Management Inc. Maintains Stake in Novartis AG (NVS)
Westrock Company (NYSE:WRK) Shares Bought by First United Bank Trust
Somerset Trust Co Buys 40 Shares of FIRST REPUBLIC BANK (FRC)
Weaver C. Barksdale & Associates Inc. Has $1,452,000 Stake in Cincinnati Financial Corporation (CINF)
H. B. Fuller (FUL) Receiving Somewhat Positive Media Coverage, Accern Reports
Imax Corporation (IMAX) Receives News Sentiment Score of 0.00
Pennsylvania Trust Co Acquires New Stake in Chesapeake Energy Corporation (CHK)
Private Trust Co. NA Takes Position in DST Systems, Inc. (DST)
Atara Biotherapeutics, Inc. (NASDAQ:ATRA) Receives Outperform Rating from William Blair
Delek US Holdings, Inc. (NYSE:DK) Cut to “Buy” at BidaskClub
Steel Dynamics, Inc. (NASDAQ:STLD) Rating Reiterated by Jefferies Group LLC
O2Micro International Limited (NASDAQ:OIIM) Receives Media Sentiment Rating of 0.24
MidSouth Bancorp (NYSE:MSL) Given News Impact Score of 0.50
American International Group Inc. Has $1.09 Million Stake in iRobot Corporation (IRBT)
Arconic Inc (NASDAQ:ARNC) Receives Hold Rating from Cowen and Company


 


Avon Products, Inc. (AVP) Stake Lowered by Prescott Group Capital Management L.L.C.

Posted by Tim Parker on Jul 23rd, 2017 // No Comments 

Prescott Group Capital Management L.L.C. lowered its position in Avon Products, Inc. (NYSE:AVP) by 46.3% during the second quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the SEC. The institutional investor owned 450,000 shares of the company’s stock after selling 387,794 shares during the period. Prescott Group Capital Management L.L.C. owned 0.10% of Avon Products worth $1,710,000 as of its most recent filing with the SEC. 
Other large investors have also recently made changes to their positions in the company. Americafirst Capital Management LLC bought a new stake in shares of Avon Products during the first quarter worth approximately $689,000. Parametrica Management Ltd raised its stake in shares of Avon Products by 119.7% in the first quarter. Parametrica Management Ltd now owns 29,338 shares of the company’s stock worth $129,000 after buying an additional 15,985 shares in the last quarter. Capstone Asset Management Co. raised its stake in shares of Avon Products by 1.5% in the first quarter. Capstone Asset Management Co. now owns 38,157 shares of the company’s stock worth $168,000 after buying an additional 560 shares in the last quarter. Highbridge Capital Management LLC bought a new stake in shares of Avon Products during the fourth quarter worth approximately $335,000. Finally, Teachers Advisors LLC raised its stake in shares of Avon Products by 223.7% in the fourth quarter. Teachers Advisors LLC now owns 2,273,528 shares of the company’s stock worth $11,459,000 after buying an additional 1,571,089 shares in the last quarter. Institutional investors and hedge funds own 86.90% of the company’s stock. 




Shares of Avon Products, Inc. (NYSE AVP) traded down 0.55% during mid-day trading on Friday, reaching $3.63. 2,702,458 shares of the company’s stock traded hands. The company has a 50 day moving average of $3.62 and a 200 day moving average of $4.37. Avon Products, Inc. has a 12 month low of $3.24 and a 12 month high of $6.96. The company’s market cap is $1.60 billion. 


 Get Avon Products Inc. alerts:



Avon Products (NYSE:AVP) last posted its quarterly earnings results on Thursday, May 4th. The company reported ($0.07) earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, missing analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.01 by $0.08. The business had revenue of $1.33 billion for the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $1.33 billion. Avon Products had a negative return on equity of 3.68% and a net margin of 0.26%. Avon Products’s quarterly revenue was up 2.0% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter in the previous year, the company posted ($0.07) earnings per share. Analysts expect that Avon Products, Inc. will post $0.22 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 
WARNING: This piece of content was reported by BNB Daily and is the property of of BNB Daily. If you are reading this piece of content on another domain, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of international trademark & copyright laws. The correct version of this piece of content can be accessed at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/23/avon-products-inc-avp-stake-lowered-by-prescott-group-capital-management-l-l-c.html. 
A number of equities research analysts have commented on the stock. Zacks Investment Research lowered shares of Avon Products from a “hold” rating to a “strong sell” rating in a report on Tuesday, July 11th. DA Davidson assumed coverage on shares of Avon Products in a report on Thursday, July 6th. They set a “neutral” rating and a $4.25 price objective on the stock. Finally, ValuEngine lowered shares of Avon Products from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a report on Friday, June 2nd. Three analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, three have assigned a hold rating and two have assigned a buy rating to the company. The company currently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and a consensus target price of $5.54.
About Avon Products
Avon Products, Inc is a manufacturer and marketer of beauty and related products. The Company’s segments include Europe, Middle East & Africa; South Latin America; North Latin America, and Asia Pacific. Its product categories are Beauty, and Fashion and Home. Beauty consists of skincare (which includes personal care), fragrance and color (cosmetics). 
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding AVP? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Avon Products, Inc. (NYSE:AVP).

 
Receive News & Ratings for Avon Products Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Avon Products Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 




















































CA Inc. (NASDAQ:CA) Downgraded by Zacks Investment Research - Watch List News



















































Home
About
Staff
Privacy Policy
Contact
























Headlines
Business
US News
Health
World
Investing
Technology




















CA Inc. - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for CA Inc. with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow Watchlist News

 











Latest News



ValuEngine Upgrades Oritani Financial Corp. (NASDAQ:ORIT) to Buy					

FORTERRA INC (FRTA) Downgraded by ValuEngine to Hold					

TriState Capital Holdings, Inc. (TSC) Lifted to Buy at ValuEngine					

WisdomTree Investments, Inc. (NASDAQ:WETF) Stock Rating Lowered by ValuEngine					

Evoke Pharma Inc (EVOK) Lifted to Hold at ValuEngine					

ValuEngine Upgrades Exponent, Inc. (NASDAQ:EXPO) to “Hold”					

Cigna Corporation (NYSE:CI) Rating Lowered to Hold at ValuEngine					

Tableau Software, Inc. (DATA) Stock Rating Lowered by ValuEngine					

Aemetis, Inc (AMTX) Upgraded at Zacks Investment Research					

CymaBay Therapeutics’ (NASDAQ:CBAY) Outperform Rating Reiterated at CIBC					

DragonWave Inc (NASDAQ:DRWI) Downgraded by Desjardins to “Sell”					

SPS Commerce, Inc. (SPSC) Now Covered by Analysts at Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc.					

Discovery Communications, Inc. (DISCK) Upgraded to “Buy” at Zacks Investment Research					

Northern Trust Corporation (NASDAQ:NTRS) Price Target Cut to $83.00					

Umpqua Holdings Corporation (NASDAQ:UMPQ) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Stephens					

Deutsche Bank AG Cuts QUALCOMM Incorporated (QCOM) Price Target to $60.00					

Digital Turbine, Inc. (APPS) Downgraded by ValuEngine					

Inter Parfums, Inc. (NASDAQ:IPAR) Upgraded at Zacks Investment Research					

ValuEngine Lowers Belden Inc (NYSE:BDC) to Hold					

Deutsche Bank AG Lowers Northern Trust Corporation (NTRS) Price Target to $93.00					



Archives

July 2017
June 2017
May 2017
April 2017
March 2017
February 2017
January 2017
December 2016
November 2016
October 2016
September 2016
August 2016
July 2016
June 2016
May 2016
March 2016
November 2015
October 2015
September 2015
August 2015
July 2015
June 2015
May 2015
April 2015
March 2015
February 2015
January 2015
December 2014
November 2014
October 2014
September 2014
August 2014
July 2014
June 2014
May 2014
April 2014
March 2014
February 2014
January 2014




 




						CA Inc. (NASDAQ:CA) Downgraded by Zacks Investment Research					

						 July 21st, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Kyle Jackson 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 






Tweet










Zacks Investment Research lowered shares of CA Inc. (NASDAQ:CA) from a buy rating to a hold rating in a research report released on Monday morning. 
According to Zacks, “CA is a leading information technology (IT) management software company. We are optimistic about CA’s acquisition strategy, which has enhanced its IT management, software and services portfolio. Moreover, we believe that the diversity of its products and the increased efficiency offered by them will attract customers across sectors, lending stability to its business model. Additionally, CA’s “go to market” sales strategy integrates the commercial functions of sales, marketing, brand management, pricing and consumer insight, which helps it in lowering costs, thereby improving the bottom line. Nonetheless, intensifying competition from peers, an uncertain economic environment, currency headwinds and the weak IT spending forecast by Gartner are other concerns. Notably, shares of the company has underperformed the broader market over the last one year period.”
Other equities research analysts have also issued reports about the company. Jefferies Group LLC  restated a buy rating and issued a $38.00 price target on shares of CA in a research report on Friday, April 28th. Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc.  restated a market perform rating on shares of CA in a research report on Friday, May 12th. Raymond James Financial, Inc.  restated a market perform rating on shares of CA in a research report on Thursday, June 22nd. Citigroup Inc. upped their price target on CA from $34.00 to $36.00 and gave the company a neutral rating in a research report on Wednesday, June 28th. Finally, DA Davidson lowered CA from a buy rating to a neutral rating in a research report on Monday, April 10th. Four equities research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, eight have issued  a hold rating and five have issued  a buy rating to the stock. CA presently has an average rating of Hold and an average target price of $35.10.




Shares of CA (NASDAQ:CA) opened at 34.64 on Monday. The company has a market capitalization of $14.47 billion, a price-to-earnings ratio of 18.72 and a beta of 0.87. CA has a 1-year low of $30.01 and a 1-year high of $36.54. The stock has a 50 day moving average price of $33.50 and a 200 day moving average price of $32.46. 
CA (NASDAQ:CA) last posted its quarterly earnings results on Thursday, May 11th. The technology company reported $0.54 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, beating analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.49 by $0.05. The business had revenue of $1.01 billion during the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $996.59 million. CA had a return on equity of 17.15% and a net margin of 19.20%. The business’s revenue was up .3% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same period in the prior year, the business earned $0.60 earnings per share.  On average, equities analysts anticipate that  CA will post $2.38 EPS for the current fiscal year. 
WARNING: “CA Inc. (NASDAQ:CA) Downgraded by Zacks Investment Research” was  posted by Watch List News and is the sole property of of Watch List News. If you are accessing this piece on another domain, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of U.S. & international copyright legislation. The legal version of this piece can be viewed at https://www.watchlistnews.com/ca-inc-nasdaqca-downgraded-by-zacks-investment-research/1454075.html. 
In other CA news, insider Ayman Sayed sold 30,194 shares of the company’s stock in a transaction on Wednesday, June 21st. The stock was sold at an average price of $35.62, for a total transaction of $1,075,510.28. Following the transaction, the insider now directly owns 168,455 shares in the company, valued at $6,000,367.10. The transaction was disclosed in a legal filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which can be accessed through the SEC website. Corporate insiders own  0.90% of the company’s stock. 
A number of hedge funds and other institutional investors have recently added to or reduced their stakes in CA. Parallel Advisors LLC boosted its position in  CA by 3.4% in the first quarter. Parallel Advisors LLC now owns 3,245 shares of the technology company’s stock worth $106,000 after buying an additional 107 shares during the period.  Acrospire Investment Management LLC boosted its position in  CA by 280.0% in the first quarter. Acrospire Investment Management LLC now owns 3,800 shares of the technology company’s stock worth $121,000 after buying an additional 2,800 shares during the period.  CENTRAL TRUST Co boosted its position in  CA by 7.4% in the second quarter. CENTRAL TRUST Co now owns 4,609 shares of the technology company’s stock worth $159,000 after buying an additional 319 shares during the period.  Tompkins Financial Corp boosted its position in  CA by 294.7% in the first quarter. Tompkins Financial Corp now owns 5,387 shares of the technology company’s stock worth $165,000 after buying an additional 4,022 shares during the period.  Finally, Hefty Wealth Partners boosted its position in  CA by 5,080.4% in the first quarter. Hefty Wealth Partners now owns 5,284 shares of the technology company’s stock worth $167,000 after buying an additional 5,182 shares during the period. Institutional investors own  70.62% of the company’s stock. 
CA Company Profile
CA, Inc (CA) is engaged in providing software solutions enabling customers to plan, develop, manage and secure applications and enterprise environments across distributed, cloud, mobile and mainframe platforms. The Company operates through three business segments: Mainframe Solutions, Enterprise Solutions and Services.
Get a free copy of the Zacks research report on CA (CA)
For more information about research offerings from Zacks Investment Research, visit Zacks.com



Receive News & Ratings for CA Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for CA Inc. and related companies with Analyst Ratings Network's FREE daily email newsletter.



 










Kyle Jackson 























 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!




Latest News




Sirius XM Making Big Investment In Pandora





Tax Reform Not Going Quite As Planned





Western Digital Files Lawsuit To Halt Toshiba Chip Business Sale





Sinclair Broadcast Group Announces Deal For Tribune Media





Starbucks Has A Hit With Its Unicorn Frappuccino











			© Watch List News, LLC 2008-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Staff 
			| Contact 

















































						Mitsubishi Ufj Trust & Banking Lowered Textron (TXT) Holding; Union Bankshares (UNB) Sentiment Is 1.5 - Bibey Post								







 


















 

























































Trending Stock News
Penny Stock News
Market News
Stock News






Mitsubishi Ufj Trust & Banking Lowered Textron (TXT) Holding; Union Bankshares (UNB) Sentiment Is 1.5


					
						July 25, 2017 - By Darrin Black

Union Bankshares, Inc. is a one-bank holding firm whose subsidiary is Union Bank . The company has market cap of $216.96 million. The Company’s business is that of a community bank in the financial services industry. It has a 24.14 P/E ratio. The Firm operates through Union Bank segment, which provides retail, commercial, municipal banking, and asset management and trust services throughout its approximately 20 banking offices, over two loan centers, and a range of automated teller machines (ATMs) covering northern Vermont and New Hampshire.







Mitsubishi Ufj Trust & Banking Corp decreased Textron (TXT) stake by 2.65% reported in 2016Q4 SEC filing. Mitsubishi Ufj Trust & Banking Corp sold 14,565 shares as Textron (TXT)’s stock declined 3.85%. The Mitsubishi Ufj Trust & Banking Corp holds 534,869 shares with $25.97 million value, down from 549,434 last quarter. Textron now has $13.33 billion valuation. The stock rose 1.41% or $0.69 reaching $49.48. About 568,655 shares traded. Textron Inc. (NYSE:TXT) has risen 23.87% since July 25, 2016 and is uptrending. It has outperformed by 7.17% the S&P500.
Spears Abacus Advisors Llc holds 0.36% of its portfolio in Union Bankshares, Inc. for 61,191 shares. Cardinal Capital Management owns 15,621 shares or 0.27% of their US portfolio. Moreover, Trust Co Of Vermont has 0.15% invested in the company for 28,215 shares. The Vermont-based Community Financial Services Group Llc has invested 0.11% in the stock. Thompson Davis & Co. Inc., a Virginia-based fund reported 500 shares.
 About 538 shares traded. Union Bankshares, Inc. (UNB) has risen 30.46% since July 25, 2016 and is uptrending. It has outperformed by 13.76% the S&P500.
Mitsubishi Ufj Trust & Banking Corp increased Intuitive Surgical (NASDAQ:ISRG) stake by 13,436 shares to 149,870 valued at $95.04M in 2016Q4. It also upped Lkq Corporation (NASDAQ:LKQ) stake by 131,881 shares and now owns 755,530 shares. Stericycle Inc. (NASDAQ:SRCL) was raised too. 
Since February 28, 2017, it had 0 insider purchases, and 1 insider sale for $24,860 activity. On Tuesday, February 28 Bamford Mark S sold $24,860 worth of Textron Inc. (NYSE:TXT) or 519 shares.
Among 13 analysts covering Textron (NYSE:TXT), 8 have Buy rating, 2 Sell and 3 Hold. Therefore 62% are positive. Textron had 19 analyst reports since September 2, 2015 according to SRatingsIntel. The rating was initiated by Morgan Stanley with “Underweight” on Thursday, June 23. The company was maintained on Wednesday, September 9 by Cowen & Co. The rating was upgraded by JP Morgan to “Overweight” on Wednesday, December 16. The rating was maintained by RBC Capital Markets with “Outperform” on Thursday, January 28. The rating was downgraded by Bank of America to “Underperform” on Friday, July 21. On Monday, July 17 the stock rating was maintained by Cowen & Co with “Buy”. The firm has “Buy” rating by Credit Suisse given on Wednesday, April 12. The firm earned “Outperform” rating on Thursday, October 6 by Robert W. Baird. Citigroup upgraded the stock to “Buy” rating in Wednesday, September 2 report. Credit Suisse maintained the shares of TXT in report on Thursday, May 25 with “Buy” rating.
Investors sentiment increased to 1.08 in Q4 2016. Its up 0.20, from 0.88 in 2016Q3. It is positive, as 34 investors sold TXT shares while 129 reduced holdings. 68 funds opened positions while 108 raised stakes. 222.53 million shares or 3.14% more from 215.76 million shares in 2016Q3 were reported. Gabelli Funds Ltd Liability Company holds 950,075 shares. Boys Arnold And stated it has 0.2% of its portfolio in Textron Inc. (NYSE:TXT). Bp Public Ltd Liability Corp holds 0.06% of its portfolio in Textron Inc. (NYSE:TXT) for 33,000 shares. Piedmont Inv Ltd has 0% invested in Textron Inc. (NYSE:TXT). Wagner Bowman Mngmt holds 10,219 shares. Ls Investment Advisors Lc accumulated 9,933 shares. Amica Mutual Ins reported 17,455 shares or 0.08% of all its holdings. Morgan Stanley holds 516,792 shares. Strs Ohio holds 164,157 shares or 0.04% of its portfolio. Cranbrook Wealth Mngmt Limited Liability Corp holds 800 shares or 0.02% of its portfolio. Stifel stated it has 0.05% in Textron Inc. (NYSE:TXT). Blackrock Japan Com Limited holds 353,160 shares or 0.06% of its portfolio. Impala Asset Mngmt Ltd Liability Corp holds 2.01% or 783,005 shares in its portfolio. Alliancebernstein Limited Partnership stated it has 474,277 shares. Bluecrest Capital Limited holds 0.04% or 13,157 shares in its portfolio.








By Darrin Black
Echostar Corporation-Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with our FREE daily email newsletter.








 

 




 
Free Newsletter Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for your stocks with our FREE daily email newsletter:






  Recent Posts 

Williams Jones & Associates Has Cut Schein Henry Com (HSIC) Stake By $391,996, California Public Employees Retirement System Has Decreased Tractor Supply Company (TSCO) Holding


Riverhead Capital Management Has Lifted Its Dolby Laboratories (DLB) Position, Gulf Island Fabrication (GIFI) Sentiment Is 1.39


Highvista Strategies Cut Its Intel (INTC) Position, Astec Industries (ASTE)’s Sentiment Is 1.91


Jaffetilchin Investment Partners Raised Its Raymond James Financial (RJF) Holding, Profile of 8 Analysts Covering McKesson (MCK)


California State Teachers Retirement System Has Raised Cousins Properties (CUZ) Stake By $2.06 Million, Ellington Residential Mortgage R (EARN) Sellers Increased By 25% Their Shorts


Reynders Mcveigh Capital Management Has Increased Its Danaher (DHR) Position, Quantum Capital Management Has Increased First Rep Bk San Francisco C (FRC) Position


Sentinel Asset Management Has Increased By $367,500 Its Signature Bank (SBNY) Position, Pros Holdings Has 1.77 Sentiment


Nokota Management LP Trimmed Jd Com (JD) Position; Myers Industries (MYE) Sentiment Is 2


Intact Investment Management Trimmed Cdn Imperial Bk Comm Toronto (CM) Holding By $13.11 Million; ResMed Inc. (RMD) Covered By 4 Bulls


Oceanic Investment Management LTD Lowered By $1.76 Million Its Devon Energy New (DVN) Position, Last Week STMicroelectronics NV (ADR) (STM) Coverage







© Copyright 2015-2017 Bibey Post Inc - bibeypost.com       About - Our Team - Contact


















	MUFG

























































































 









Search► 












  Home


  Services


Capital Markets Group

Convertible & Equity-Linked Securities
Credit Advisory
Debt Capital Markets
Derivative Solutions
Equity Capital Markets
Investment Grade
Leveraged Finance
Liability Management
Municipal Finance
Private Placements



Equities & Derivatives

Convertible Bonds
Corporate Access
Equity Derivatives
Equity Sales & Trading
Investor Relations



Fixed Income

Credit
Emerging Markets
Rates



Structured Products

Asset-backed Securities
Structured Financing
Structured Notes
Structured Trading






  Market commentary



  Careers


Working for us


Our hiring process


International Analyst Programme


Our values





  News



  About us


Our firm


Our history


Corporate Social Responsibility


Legal and regulatory

US important notices
US disclaimers



Locations




  Contact us























			
	AboutUs Site
	
		





Home > AboutUs > About












Our firm
	


Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group (MUFG) is one of the world's leading financial groups. Our services include corporate banking, commercial banking, retail banking, wealth management, investment banking, capital markets, personal and corporate trust, and transaction banking. Headquartered in Tokyo, MUFG is a global network with 1,100 offices in more than 40 countries, more than 140,000 colleagues, and about 300 companies. MUFG’s operating companies include Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ, Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation and Mitsubishi UFJ Securities Holdings Co., Ltd.
MUFG Securities offers a comprehensive product suite to clients around the world through five key business lines: capital markets, credit, rates, equities and structured products.
Through close collaboration among our group members, MUFG aims to be the world's most trusted financial group, responding to all the financial needs of our corporate, commercial and institutional clients with a flexible approach, and providing best in class service and products.











Our mission, vision and values
Our mission, vision and values make us unique and provide the foundation for our business. 
We strive to be a foundation of strength, committed to meeting the needs of our customers, serving society, and fostering shared and sustainable growth for a better world.
Working together to achieve our vision of becoming the world’s most trusted financial group, our values reflect who we are and guide how we behave:
Integrity and responsibility
Strive to be fair, transparent, and honest. Always act responsibly in the best interests of customers and society as a whole, building long-term stakeholder relationships and giving back to our communities.
Professionalism and teamwork
Respect the diversity of our fellow workers and foster a strong spirit of teamwork. Expect the highest levels of professionalism.
Challenge ourselves to grow
Adopt a global perspective to anticipate trends and opportunities for growth. Create and sustain a responsive and dynamic workplace, where everyone can focus on providing outstanding customer service and embrace new challenges.
Credit rating

Mitsubishi UFJFinancial Group
Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ
Mitsubishi UFJTrust and Banking
MUFG Securities EMEA plc
MUFG Securities Americas Inc.
Moody's
Long Term
-
A1
A1
A1
-
Short-Term
-
P-1
P-1
P-1
-
S&P
Long Term
A
A+
A+
A+
A+1
Short-Term
-
A-1
A-1
A-1
A-1
Fitch
Long Term
- 
A
A
-
A
Short-Term
-
F1
F1
-
F1
R&I
Long Term
A+
AA-
AA-
-
-
Short-Term
-
a-1+
-
-
-
JCR
Long Term
AA-
AA
AA
AA
-
Short-Term
-
-
J-1+
-
-
Our history
With roots tracing back about 350 years, MUFG has long been one of the most important companies in Japan. Since the group’s expansion outside of Japan in 1880, we have established a network of 1,100 offices in over 40 countries. We also have the distinction of having the largest global customer base of any financial institution headquartered in Japan. MUFG is made up of around 300 entities that offer services including commercial banking, trust banking, securities, credit cards, consumer finance, asset management, and leasing. With our worldwide network of over 140,000 talented professionals with extensive experience in every area of modern finance, we are equipped with the best assets to compete aggressively with other global financial institutions in every market in which we conduct business.
Recent history of MUFG
2005

●
Creation of Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group (MUFG) through the merger of Mitsubishi Tokyo Financial Group (MTFG) and UFJ Holdings.

●
Creation of Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking through the merger of Mitsubishi Trust and Banking Corporation and UFJ Trust Bank. Mitsubishi Securities and UFJ Tsubasa Securities merged to form Mitsubishi UFJ Securities.

2006

●
Creation of Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ (BTMU) through the merger of Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi and UFJ Bank.

2007

●
Creation of Mitsubishi UFJ Lease & Finance and Mitsubishi UFJ NICOS. MUFG made Mitsubishi UFJ Securities a wholly-owned subsidiary of MUFG.

2008

●
MUFG acquired 21% shares of Morgan Stanley.*


*22.4% as of December 2013

●
Union Bank became a wholly owned subsidiary of BTMU.

2010

●
Creation of Mitsubishi UFJ Securities Holdings. Mitsubishi UFJ Securities and the investment banking operations of Morgan Stanley Japan Securities (currently Morgan Stanley MUFG Securities Co., Ltd.) integrated to form Mitsubishi UFJ Morgan Stanley Securities.

2013

●
BTMU acquired 72% shares of Bank of Ayudhya Public Company Limited (Krungsri).

●
BTMU acquired 20% shares of Vietnam Joint Stock Commercial Bank for Industry and Trade (VietinBank).

2014

●
On 1 July, operating companies Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ, Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation and Mitsubishi UFJ Securities Holdings Co., Ltd, outside of Japan, came together under the MUFG brand. Now one name is all you need to know to access our corporate and investment banking and securities services on six continents.

Corporate Social Responsibility
We seek to maximise our positive social contribution by raising aspirations, inspiring future generations, and giving back to the local community. With integrity at the core of our culture, we are committed to working in partnership with the communities surrounding our offices; investing time and money to address their needs as well as those of local charities.
To demonstrate this commitment, we provide a range of charitable initiatives that suit the strategic focus and interest of employees. The opportunities on offer through our volunteer programmes vary in scope, but remain consistent in their objective to empower employees to use their skills and experience to make a positive long-term impact on the local community.
To complement this programme, we offer a matched funding scheme to encourage and extend the reach of our employees' charitable giving.
Our locations

Chicago
227 West Monroe Street, Suite 1550 Chicago, Illinois 60606
 
Telephone: +1 312 366 - 3281

Hong Kong
11/F AIA Central, 1 Connaught Road, Central, Hong Kong
 
 
Telephone: +852 2860 1500
 
 

Dubai
Level 3, East Wing, The Gate, Dubai International Finance Centre, PO Box 506894, Dubai, UAE
 
Telephone: +971 4709 6001 
​​
Houston
4265 San Felipe, Suite 780, Houston, Texas 77027​
 
 
Telephone: +1 713 351 6460
 
 

London
Ropemaker Place, 25 Ropemaker Street, London, EC2Y 9AJ
 
Telephone: +44 207 628 5555​
 

 
New York
1221 Avenue of the Americas, 6th Floor, New York, NY, 10020-1001
 
 
Telephone: +1 212 405 7000
 

 
San Francisco
400 California Street, 11th Floor, San Francisco, CA 94104
 
Telephone: +1 415 765 2370

Sydney
1 Macquarie Place, Sydney, NSW 2000, Australia
Telephone: +61 280 754 780
Singapore
7 Straits View, #23-01 Marina One East Tower, Singapore 018936 
 
Telephone: +65 6536 7818​
 

​​​
 
MUFG network
Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group
Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust & Banking
Mitsubishi UFJ Morgan Stanley
 
 









 




 


What we do
Capital Markets
Fixed Income
Structured Products
Equity & Derivatives


Who we are
Our firm
Our history
Contact us


Our culture
Our mission, vision and values
Corporate Social Responsibility
Working for us


Our network
Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities Holdings
Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ
Bank of Ayudhya Public Company Limited (Krungsri)
Union Bank



 







































About MUTB : Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking










































Home
About MUTB



About MUTB


Information about MUTB

Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking (MUTB) was established in 1927, and has been in business for approximately 100 years. MUTB is a wholly owned subsidiary of MUFG and a core MUFG company. With total assets of 45.7 trillion yen as of March 31, 2016, it is one of Japan's largest trust banks. 
Besides operations in Japan, MUTB serves customers to pursue its global business through a worldwide network of branches and subsidiaries in Asia, Europe and the United States. As Japan's major trust bank, MUTB offers high-quality and comprehensive financial services for customers, which include various commercial banking services as well as asset management and administration, real estate, and stock transfer agency services.
Our goal is to be "A truly reliable trust bank." We have firmly grasped the needs of our customers and society to provide timely, high quality products and services through our expertise as a trust bank.









As one of the core companies of the Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group, Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation ...
Company Name Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation Management Mikio Ikegaya, President ...
MUTB's Corporate Vision conforms to MUFG policies. Please see MUFG's website for ...







MUTB has an "in-house company" model of management based on six business units  ...
MUTB's strengths lie in its consulting capability combining trust functions with banking ...
MUTB addresses the needs of its customers on a global basis through its strategic ...







Statement of IncomeBalance Sheets
We aim to help realize a sustainable society, while fulfilling our inherent mission ...
The Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Report 2016 was newly introduced ...



Return to Top of Page














Mitsubishi UFJ Trust & Banking Corp/Singapore: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback























mitsubishi ufj trust & banking corp/singapore
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Banking
Sub-Industry: Banks
Mitsubishi Ufj Trust And Banking Corporation was founded in 1987. The Company's line of business includes holding or owning the securities of banks for the sole purpose of exercising some degree of control over the activities of bank companies whose securities they hold.




Corporate Information
Address:

50 Raffles Place
Singapore Land Tower #42-01/06
Singapore, 048623
Singapore


Phone:
65-62259155


Fax:
65-62241857























From The Web












Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data



































Mitsubishi UFJ Trust And Banking Corporation: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 26, 2017 5:56 PM ET
Diversified Financial Services

Company Overview of Mitsubishi UFJ Trust And Banking Corporation



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation provides various commercial banking, asset management and administration, real estate, and stock transfer agency services to individual and corporate clients in Japan, rest of Asia, Europe, and the United States. It offers retail and corporate banking services; asset management services, including managing funds for corporate pension, public pension, financial institutions, and corporate clients; asset administration services, such as administration of derivatives, foreign investment trusts, bonds, and equity investments; and pension products and services comprising corporate pension plan design, pension asset management, and administration, as we...
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation provides various commercial banking, asset management and administration, real estate, and stock transfer agency services to individual and corporate clients in Japan, rest of Asia, Europe, and the United States. It offers retail and corporate banking services; asset management services, including managing funds for corporate pension, public pension, financial institutions, and corporate clients; asset administration services, such as administration of derivatives, foreign investment trusts, bonds, and equity investments; and pension products and services comprising corporate pension plan design, pension asset management, and administration, as well as consulting services. The company also provides real estate services consisting of brokerage, real estate appraisal, real estate trust and custodian, property management, real estate securitization arrangement, and real estate asset management services, as well as support for real estate-related financial strategies for corporate customers and investors. In addition, it offers stock transfer agency services, including shareholder register administration, IPO support, consulting, and other services; and foreign exchange trading services. As of January 01, 2017, the company operated through a network of 56 branches and 2 satellite offices in Japan, as well as 4 branches and 2 representative offices internationally. The company was founded in 1927 and is based in Tokyo, Japan. Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation is a subsidiary of Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group, Inc.
Detailed Description


4-5, Marunouchi 1-ChomeChiyoda-kuTokyo,  100-8212JapanFounded in 192713,015 Employees



Phone: 81 3 3212 1211

www.tr.mufg.jp/english







Key Executives for Mitsubishi UFJ Trust And Banking Corporation




Mr. Mikio Ikegaya


      	Chief Executive Officer, President, Senior Managing Directors and Representative Director
      


Age: 59
        







 Tetsuya Yonehana


      	Chief Financial Officer, CSO, Managing Executive Officer and Director
      








Mr. Toshihiko Mori


      	Director, Senior Managing Executive Officer and Business Head of Corporate Finance & Services
      


Age: 56
        







 Hiroshi Naruse


      	Chief Legal, Compliance, Corp Dev, HR & Risk Officer, Dy President, Senior MD & Rep Director
      


Age: 59
        







Mr. Kenichi Miyanaga CFA


      	Director, Deputy President, Executive Officer & Business Head of Corporate Agency Business
      


Age: 57
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

Mitsubishi UFJ Trust And Banking Corporation Key Developments

Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation Announces Non-Consolidated Earnings Results for the Nine Months Ended December 31, 2016
Feb 3 17
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust And Banking Corporation announced non-consolidated earnings results for the nine months ended December 31, 2016. For the period, the company reported net interest income of ¥123,213 million against ¥137,307 million a year ago. Net operating profits were ¥144,611 million against ¥130,854 million a year ago. Ordinary profits were ¥153,903 million against ¥137,975 million a year ago. Income before income taxes was ¥148,248 million against ¥137,324 million a year ago. Net income was ¥110,137 million against ¥96,660 million a year ago.


Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation Reports Consolidated and Non-Consolidated Earnings Results for the Six Months Ended September 30, 2016
Nov 17 16
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust And Banking Corporation reported consolidated and non-consolidated earnings results for the six months ended September 30, 2016. For the period, the consolidated company reported net interest income of JPY 50,915 million compared with JPY 91,167 million a year ago. Ordinary profits was JPY 105,547 million compared with JPY 115,336 million a year ago. Profit before income taxes was JPY 100,300 million compared with JPY 114,824 million a year ago. Profits attributable to owners of parent was JPY 65,439 million compared with JPY 79,594 million a year ago. 

For the period, the non-consolidated company reported net interest income of JPY 40,062 million compared with JPY 49,755 million a year ago. Ordinary profits was JPY 105,515 million compared with JPY 99,549 million a year ago. Income before income taxes was JPY 99,959 million compared with JPY 99,095 million a year ago. Net income was JPY 75,728 million compared with JPY 70,359 million a year ago.


Mitsubishi UFJ Eyeing Shinkin Trust
Oct 31 16
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust And Banking Corporation may acquire Shinkin Trust Bank, Ltd. from by Shinkin Central Bank (TSE:8421). According to the news report, Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking will ink an agreement as early as October 31, 2016 to acquire the Shinkin Trust Bank. It further mentioned that the purchase of Shinkin Trust is estimated to cost more than ¥10 billion at the most and is set to conclude by summer of 2017. The Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group unit plans to fully absorb operations of Shinkin Trust.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 Abukuma Shinkin Bank Asia AdachiSeiwa Shinkin Bank Asia ADC Technology Inc. Asia Aichi Police Credit Union Asia Aichi Shogin Inc. Asia




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Merger/Acquisition

			      March 4, 2017
			    
Aberdeen Asset Management PLC



Merger/Acquisition

			      October 31, 2016
			    
Shinkin Trust Bank, Ltd.





Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Mitsubishi UFJ Trust And Banking Corporation, please visit www.tr.mufg.jp/english.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close






























MUFG; Products & Services | Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group



















p
L




to Global Navigation
to Contents
to Local Navigation
to Site Information








Search

Search



Japanese>
 | 
English>

>Major Group Company WebsitesDBank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJDMitsubishi UFJ Trust and BankingDMitsubishi UFJ Securities HoldingsDMUFG Americas Holdings CorporationDBank of Ayudhya ("Krungsri")>Major Related Companies
>Major Related Companies>
>Site Map>

Text size : 
Standard+Enlarge



:Close









)HOME
)About MUFG>
)Press Releases>
)Products & Services
>
)Investor Relations>
)Stock Information>
)Sustainability>
)Careers>





HOME > Products & Services

Listen to this page
Print this page







Products & Services



Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group (MUFG) is one of the world's largest comprehensive financial groups, comprising a diverse range of leading companies in a wide array of financial businesses.
As a world-class comprehensive financial services provider, we leverage the expertise of each MUFG group company to provide a robust portfolio of financial solutions, including banking, trust banking, securities, credit cards, and leasing.







)Consumer Business / Private Banking


)Corporate & Investment Banking




)Asset Management / Investor Services / Real Estate









>Products & Services

>Consumer Business / Private Banking
>Corporate & Investment Banking
>Asset Management / Investor Services / Real Estate




Stock Price CODE(8306)










u
Stock Chart
>




Terms and Conditions
>






Latest IR Documents:





IR Calendar>


Request for Annual ReportD


News AlertsD


FAQs>













)About MUFG
>Message from Management
>Company Overview
>Business Strategy
>Corporate Vision, CI
>Key Figures
>Management Structure
>Global Network
>Major Related Companies
)Press Releases
)Products & Services
>Consumer Business /
Private Banking
>Corporate & Investment Banking
>Asset Management / Investor Services / Real Estate




)Investor Relations
>Summary Reports
>Investor Presentations
>Fact Book
>SEC Filings
>Annual Reports
>Basel Ⅲ Disclosure
>Road Map to Risk Disclosures
>IR Calendar




)Stock Information
>Shareholders Meeting
>Stock Information
>Stock Procedure Information
>Dividend Information
>Ratings and Bond Information
>Analyst Coverage




)Sustainability
>Message from the CEO
>MUFG's CSR
>CSR Materiality
>CSR Domains Trusted By Society
>Efforts to Our Stakeholders
>Corporate Governance
>Participation in Initiatives
>Evaluation from External Institutions
>CSR data
>Comparison Tables
>Third Party Opinion




)Careers
)Stock Price
DRequest for Annual Report
DNews Alerts
)FAQs
)Updated History




Major Group Company Websites

Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ
Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities Holdings
MUFG Americas Holdings Corporation
Bank of Ayudhya ("Krungsri")






This page contains contents that require Adobe Flash Player.>About Adobe Flash Player
Documents with this mark are optimized for Adobe Reader.>About Adobe Reader
Documents with this mark are optimized for Windows Media Player.>About Windows Media Player
Click the  on the top of the page once. ReadSpeaker automatically reads the text within the predesignated range.>About text reading service


>Terms and Conditions>
>Personal Information Protection Policy>
>Policy for Conflicts of Interest Management>
>IR Policy>











Mitsubishi Corporation - Press Room - 2010 - Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation and Mitsubishi Corporation to jointly launch Japan’s first Precious Metals Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) backed by physical metal stored domestically (Product Name: “Japan Physical Precious Metals ETF”)  | Mitsubishi Corporation












































Press Room




June 14, 2010



Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation
Mitsubishi Corporation 





Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation and Mitsubishi Corporation to jointly launch Japan’s first Precious Metals Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) backed by physical metal stored domestically (Product Name: “Japan Physical Precious Metals ETF”) 




Mitsubishi UFJ Trust and Banking Corporation (MUTB, President: Kinya Okauchi) and Mitsubishi Corporation (MC, President and CEO: Yorihiko Kojima) have received approval from Tokyo Stock Exchange, Inc. (TSE) for the listing of the Japan Physical Precious Metals ETFs (Series Name: “Fruit of Gold”), backed by physical Gold, Platinum, Silver and Palladium stored in Japan. The 4 precious metals ETFs will be listed on the TSE on July 2nd 2010.
 
The Japan Physical Precious Metals ETF (“Fruit of Gold” series) will be the first precious metals based ETF to use Beneficiary Certificates Issuing Trusts mechanism prescribed after the revision of the Trust Act in 2006, as the ETFs will be backed by physical metals stored in Japan and will utilize and integrate MUTB’s (Japan’s largest Trust Bank) expertise on the trusts business and MC’s precious metals procurement and global trading capabilities.
 
The “Fruit of Gold” series of ETFs, which are linked to price indexes expressed in yen/gram, will not only allow investors to trade from just one unit, but will also allow investors that meet a certain criteria to trade in their certificates of beneficiary interest for the respective physical metal, which is a new and never before seen concept.
 
Precious metals are essential resources not only for the jewelry sector, but for Japan’s industrial sector as well. The “Fruit of Gold” series ETFs not only allow investors to trade in their certificates of beneficiary Interest for the respective physical metal, but also in a broader sense, allow Japan to accumulate a stockpile of physical precious metals domestically by storing them in warehouses designated by MC within the country.
 
MUTB and MC will continue to strive in satisfying the diversifying needs of their customers, by focusing on their Beneficiary Certificates Issuing Trusts business and Precious Metals Business, respectively.
 
 
【About the Japan Physical Precious Metals ETF (“Fruit of Gold” series)】
 





Name


Trading Unit


Security Code


Trust Asset




Japan Physical Gold ETF
(Nickname: “Fruit of Gold”)


1 Unit
 


1540


Gold Ingot（Purity: 99.99%）




Japan Physical Platinum ETF
(Nickname: “Fruit of Platinum”)


1 Unit
 


1541


Platinum Ingot（Purity:99.95%）




Japan Physical Silver ETF
(Nickname: “Fruit of Silver”)


1 Unit
 


1542


Silver Ingot（Purity: 99.99%）




Japan Physical Palladium ETF
(Nickname: “Fruit of Palladium”)


1 Unit
 


1543


Palladium Ingot（Purity: 99.95%）











Inquiry Recipient
 Mitsubishi Corporation




Telephone:+81-3-3210-2171
 / 
Facsimile:+81-3-5252-7705














Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











2017 Mitsubishi Outlander - Crossover | Mitsubishi Motors




















































  














 








					OT45
			













OUTLANDER










OUTLANDER


VEHICLES



Outlander Sport
Outlander
Lancer
Lancer Evolution
Mirage
Mirage G4
Concept Cars
Certified Pre-Owned


UPCOMING OUTLANDER PHEV						



UPCOMING ECLIPSE CROSS						





CROSSOVERS



Outlander Sport

FROM
$19,7951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Outlander

FROM
$23,4951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





CARS



Lancer

FROM
$17,7951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Lancer Evolution

FROM
$34,4951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Mirage

FROM
$12,9951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Mirage G4

FROM
$13,9951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									







Concept Cars



Certified Pre-Owned


UPCOMING VEHICLES



UPCOMING VEHICLES



OUTLANDER PHEV
        




ECLIPSE CROSS
        




SHOPPING TOOLS





Build and Price										






Search Inventory										






Find a Dealer										








Request a Quote								



Request a Test Drive								



Compare Vehicles								



Certified Pre-Owned								



Get a Brochure								








Special Offers								



Payment Calculator								



Trade-in Appraisal								



Free Equifax Credit Score								



Finance Plans								







Inside Mitsubishi





Who we are										








Engineering Milestones								



Concept Cars								



History								



Company								








Warranty										






Roadside Assistance										







OWNERS





###

Email*



Forgot Password? 
Password*




Submit


 Sign Up








Owner's Home								



My Garage								



Service								



Parts and Accessories								



Support								



Offers								



Pay Online								








Events and Auto Shows								



Mitsubishi Owners Day and Past Events								









MAIN NAV

OUTLANDER
GALLERY
TRIMS AND SPECS
FEATURES
ACCESSORIES














THE 2017 MITSUBISHI                    


OUTLANDER
                























Starting at
$23,495
		            		1





MPG
25/302


Seats
7




powertrain limited warranty
10yrs/100Kmiles3





SPECIAL OFFERS







2016 Outlander

                                    NEGOTIATE YOUR BEST PRICE AND GET $4,000 CASH BACK.



Valid Through July 31




SEE ALL OFFERS
        







2017 Outlander

                                    NEGOTIATE YOUR BEST PRICE AND GET $2,000 CASH BACK.



Valid Through July 31




SEE ALL OFFERS
        











By popular demand, here's the full length song from our latest commercial.





Experience the outlander like never before
Explore every angle of the new 2017 Outlander and its impressive features in the virtual showroom.

                Launch 360




















































































Cool Silver



Rally Red



Cosmic Blue



Diamond White



Labrador Black



Quartz Brown



Mercury Gray








                Launch 360 video


                    View Gallery
                    






























 DRAG & CLICK TO EXPLORE














                    "Your browser does not support the video tag..." 
            
























MULTI-VIEW CAMERA SYSTEM
                        



            
The new Multi-View Camera System4 allows you to see a 360 degree, bird's eye view of your vehicle as you back up out of a parking spot or driveway.                            




WATCH VIDEO
        






















ADAPTIVE CRUISE CONTROL 
                        



            
Adaptive Cruise Control moderates your Outlander's speed to help you maintain a safe distance from the vehicle in front of you.                             






















FORWARD COLLISION MITIGATION 
                        



            
The Forward Collision Mitigation5 system helps prevent or reduce the severity of frontal collisions by warning you of a vehicle or person at an unsafe distance ahead and then applying the brakes as necessary.                             




WATCH VIDEO
        






















SUPER ALL-WHEEL CONTROL 
                        



            
Super All-Wheel Control combines several advanced technologies to help give you maximum traction in challenging environments, including rain, snow and loose gravel.                            






















REAR CROSS TRAFFIC ALERT 
                        



            
Rear Cross Traffic Alert6 helps you safely back out of a parking space or driveway by alerting you if another vehicle is about to cross your path.                            




WATCH VIDEO
        






















BLIND SPOT WARNING
                        



            
Together Blind Spot Warning and Lane Change Assist6 help you safely change lanes by alerting you when a vehicle is in or approaching your blind spot.                            




WATCH VIDEO
        






















LANE DEPARTURE WARNING 
                        



            
Lane Departure Warning helps you stay alert by warning you if you start to accidentally drift from your lane.6 




































ROOM FOR SEVEN HAPPY RIDERS
                        



            
The 2017 Outlander goes beyond seating seven passengers with its standard third row. It features sophisticated upgrades like available heated front seats and steering wheel, front dual-zone automatic climate control and premium Rockford Fosgate® surround sound.                            




EXPLORE INTERIOR
        






















YOUR WORLD, AT YOUR FINGERTIPS 
                        



            
Life can be hectic, so we made it incredibly easy to reschedule appointments, get directions, change songs and access apps from your smartphone, all directly from the 7" touchscreen or with a simple spoken command. If only everything else in life were that simple.                            




Explore Apple CarPlayTM7





Explore Android AutoTM8










						ACCOLADES





























"10 Most Affordable 3-Row Vehicles"						





The Mitsubishi Outlander was named one of the "10 Most Affordable 3-Row Vehicles" of 2017, according to Kelley Blue Book's KBB.com for the fourth consecutive year. Rated as the number one most affordable 3-row vehicle, the 2017 Outlander was recognized for its proven off-road credentials, feature-rich cabin and great warranty.					
*For more information, visit Kelley Blue Book's KBB.com. Kelley Blue Book is a registered trademark of Kelley Blue Book Co., Inc.
























*With Forward Collision Mitigation and Specific Headlights




THE MITSUBISHI OUTLANDER HAS								
ONCE AGAIN BEEN RECOGNIZED BY IIHS								
WITH ITS TOP SAFETY PICK + AWARD						








Learn More
        





























"I've owned a Toyota, Honda, Volkswagen, Scion and a couple of Kias - this is my favorite car to date."						


KBB.com visitor					





See owner reviews
        





























"Test drive one, then you will agree that it is better than RAV4, Forester, and CRV."						


KBB.com visitor					





See owner reviews
        




















OVERALL CONSUMER RATING 
















8.8 out of 10based on 49 ratings 






See owners ratings
        






































DON'T COUNT THE MILES.                            
MAKE THE MILES COUNT
                        



            
We believe vehicles should be built to last.Which is why we engineer every Mitsubishi for incredible durability and then back it by a 10-year/100,000-mile powertrain limited warranty3one of the best in the industry.                            




SEE WARRANTY DETAILS
        






THE OUTLANDER ADVANTAGE  













COMPARE VEHICLES
COMPARE VEHICLES


THE OUTLANDER ADVANTAGE 
WE VALUE YOUR SAFETY, SO WE MAKE SAFETY AFFORDABLE.











STARTING MSRP1											1







3RD ROW SEAT								



7.0" TOUCHSCREEN + APPLE CARPLAY™	  + ANDROID AUTO™								



LED HEADLIGHTS								



MULTI-VIEW CAMERA SYSTEM								



BLIND SPOT WARNING + LANE CHANGE ASSIST + REAR CROSS TRAFFIC ALERT								



FORWARD COLLISION MITIGATION								



10YR / 100K POWERTRAIN LIMITED WARRANTY								






2017 Outlander SEL 2WD + Touring Package						



$29,495								




 YES									



YES									



YES									



YES									



YES									



YES									



YES									






2017 Chevrolet Equinox Premier 2WD						



$30,040								




NO									



NO									



NO									



NO									



NO									



NO									



NO									






2017 Ford Escape Titanium 2WD						



$29,100								




NO									



YES									



NO									



NO									



YES									



NO									



NO									






2017 Subaru Forester 2.5i Touring AWD						



$31,295								




NO									



NO									



YES									



NO									



NO									



NO									



NO									






2016 Honda CR-V Touring 2WD						



$32,195								




NO									



NO									



NO									



NO									



NO									



YES									



NO									










STARTING MSRP11


3RD ROW SEAT


7.0" TOUCHSCREEN + APPLE CARPLAY™	  + ANDROID AUTO™


LED HEADLIGHTS


MULTI-VIEW CAMERA SYSTEM


BLIND SPOT WARNING + LANE CHANGE ASSIST + REAR CROSS TRAFFIC ALERT


FORWARD COLLISION MITIGATION


10YR / 100K POWERTRAIN LIMITED WARRANTY
















2017 Outlander SEL 2WD + Touring Package										



 
												$29,4951

 
 YES										
 
YES										
 
YES										
 
YES										
 
YES										
 
YES										
 
YES										






2017 Chevrolet Equinox Premier 2WD										



 
												$30,0401

 
NO										
 
NO										
 
NO										
 
NO										
 
NO										
 
NO										
 
NO										






2017 Ford Escape Titanium 2WD										



 
												$29,1001

 
NO										
 
YES										
 
NO										
 
NO										
 
YES										
 
NO										
 
NO										






2017 Subaru Forester 2.5i Touring AWD										



 
												$31,2951

 
NO										
 
NO										
 
YES										
 
NO										
 
NO										
 
NO										
 
NO										






2016 Honda CR-V Touring 2WD										



 
												$32,1951

 
NO										
 
NO										
 
NO										
 
NO										
 
NO										
 
YES										
 
NO										



 















WHICH OUTLANDER IS RIGHT FOR YOU?














ES
Standard features:

 7-Passenger Seating
6.1” Touchscreen Display Audio
Rearview Camera
18” Two-Tone Alloy Wheels


Starting at $23,4951



BUILD THIS TRIM
        







SE
ES features PLUS:

Available Super All-Wheel-Control
7” Touchscreen with Apple CarPlay™ & Android Auto™
FAST Key Entry with Push Button Start
Heated Front Seats


Starting at $24,4951



BUILD THIS TRIM
        







SEL
SE features PLUS:

Available Blind Spot Warning, Lane Change Assist, & Rear Cross Traffic Alert
Leather Seating Surfaces
Power Folding Side-View Mirrors
Power Driver's Seat


Starting at $25,4951



BUILD THIS TRIM
        







GT 3.0 S-AWC
SEL features PLUS:

3.0L MIVEC Engine
Available Multi-view Camera System 
Super All-Wheel-Control
Rockford Fosgate® Premium Audio System


Starting at $31,6951



BUILD THIS TRIM
        





SWIPE TO SEE MORE TRIMS



















Not quite what you where looking for?                    


HOW ABOUT OUTLANDER SPORT:
                







EXPLORE OUTLANDER SPORT
        









DISCLAIMERS			






* Optional Feature
 Vehicles shown may have optional equipment.
† Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price for 2017 Outlander ES 2WD is $23,495. GT w/ Touring Package model as shown MSRP is $33,195. Excludes destination/handling, tax, title, license etc. Retailer price, terms and vehicle availability may vary. See your Mitsubishi retailer for details.
1 Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price. Excludes destination/handling, tax, title, license etc. Retailer price, terms and vehicle availability may vary. See your Mitsubishi retailer for details.
2 EPA mileage estimate. Actual mileage may vary.
3 All coverage terms are from the original in-service dates, and are applicable only to the original owner of new, retailed models purchased from an authorized Mitsubishi dealer. Subsequent owners receive the balance of the New Vehicle Limited Warranty of 5 years/60,000 miles. See retailer for limited warranty and roadside assistance terms and conditions.
4 Optional Feature. The Multi-View Camera system is a driver aid only and is not a substitute for visual confirmation. The view on the screen is limited and objects outside that view will not be seen.
5 Optional Feature. The Forward Collision Mitigation (FCM)/Pedestrian Detection (PD) system is a driver aid only and is not a substitute for safe and careful driving. Under certain circumstances, the system may not detect other vehicles and/or pedestrians correctly. 
6 Optional Feature. The Blind Spot Warning, Lane Change Assist and Rear Cross Traffic Alert systems are driver aids only and are not substitutes for safe and careful driving. Under certain circumstances, these systems may not detect other vehicles correctly. 
7 Apple CarPlay, Siri, Apple Music and Apple Maps are trademarks of Apple Inc., registered in the U.S.
and other countries.
8 Android Auto, Google Maps and other marks are trademarks of Google Inc.




























We are trying to improve mitsubishicars.com to provide you with the best experience. We would greatly appreciate your help by answering the following three questions.
No
Yes







































Search Local Mitsubishi Dealership Inventory | Mitsubishi Motors




















































  














 


























VEHICLES



Outlander Sport
Outlander
Lancer
Lancer Evolution
Mirage
Mirage G4
Concept Cars
Certified Pre-Owned


UPCOMING OUTLANDER PHEV						



UPCOMING ECLIPSE CROSS						





CROSSOVERS



Outlander Sport

FROM
$19,7951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Outlander

FROM
$23,4951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





CARS



Lancer

FROM
$17,7951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Lancer Evolution

FROM
$34,4951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Mirage

FROM
$12,9951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Mirage G4

FROM
$13,9951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									







Concept Cars



Certified Pre-Owned


UPCOMING VEHICLES



UPCOMING VEHICLES



OUTLANDER PHEV
        




ECLIPSE CROSS
        




SHOPPING TOOLS





Build and Price										






Search Inventory										






Find a Dealer										








Request a Quote								



Request a Test Drive								



Compare Vehicles								



Certified Pre-Owned								



Get a Brochure								








Special Offers								



Payment Calculator								



Trade-in Appraisal								



Free Equifax Credit Score								



Finance Plans								







Inside Mitsubishi





Who we are										








Engineering Milestones								



Concept Cars								



History								



Company								








Warranty										






Roadside Assistance										







OWNERS





###

Email*



Forgot Password? 
Password*




Submit


 Sign Up








Owner's Home								



My Garage								



Service								



Parts and Accessories								



Support								



Offers								



Pay Online								








Events and Auto Shows								



Mitsubishi Owners Day and Past Events								





















						Find your mitsubishi





Use Current location
        




*Service unavaliable please enter your zipcode
OR


Please enter a valid zip code


Search Inventory					

Search our entire inventory of Mitsubishi vehicles local to you.					
Search now





Next






Let's get started. 								
Choose up to two models					


Please select a vehicle to continue.
Please select no more than two vehicles to continue.





Outlander				









Outlander
from $22,995
							1
msrp





Outlander Sport				









Outlander Sport
from $19,595
							1
msrp





Lancer				









Lancer
from $17,595
							1
msrp





Lancer Evolution				









Lancer Evolution
from $34,495
							1
msrp





Mirage				









Mirage
from $12,995
							1
msrp





Mirage G4				









Mirage G4
from $13,995
							1
msrp





















									Find your mitsubishi




Start by entering your zip code.								




Please enter a valid zip code





Search Inventory										


Search our entire inventory of Mitsubishi vehicles local to you.											

Search now



OR



Contact a dealer										


Need a hand finding that perfect Mitsubishi?											

Get help from a dealer in your area with just a few clicks.											

Let us help







Let's get started. Choose up to two models								


Please select a vehicle to continue.
Please select no more than two vehicles to continue.






Outlander				









Outlander
from $22,995
							1
msrp





Outlander Sport				









Outlander Sport
from $19,595
							1
msrp





Lancer				









Lancer
from $17,595
							1
msrp





Lancer Evolution				









Lancer Evolution
from $34,495
							1
msrp





Mirage				









Mirage
from $12,995
							1
msrp





Mirage G4				









Mirage G4
from $13,995
							1
msrp




Next














DISCLAIMERS			






1 Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price. Excludes destination/handling, tax, title, license etc. Retailer price, terms and vehicle availability may vary. See your Mitsubishi retailer for details.














Thank You
A dealer will be in contact with you shortly.










Contact a Dealer 












I want to:*

Get a quote
Get a test drive
Learn about special offers




                                    Model*



Select

Mirage G4
Mirage
Outlander Sport
Outlander
Lancer


Outlander Sport
Outlander
Lancer


Lancer Evolution






                                    Trim*



Select





                                    First Name*





                                    Last Name*





                                    Email*





Phone                                



Mobile
Work
Home




Terms & Conditions

Send me communications about upcoming events and promotions via text message.Standard text messaging and data rates may apply.



Phone                                    *Mobile phone needed


Mobile


By clicking on the submit button, I agree that: (1) I give Mitsubishi Motors North America, Inc. and its authorized dealerships, permission to contact me about Mitsubishi products, services and promotions at the phone number, email address and/or mailing address I've provided above. (2) I consent to be contacted through text messages and/or through the use of an automated technology. (3) I am not required to sign this agreement or agree to the foregoing as a condition of purchasing any property, goods, or services. (4) I acknowledge that I have read and agree to the Privacy statement.





Submit
        





Next
        











Select up to 2 Dealers




Deselect a dealer to choose another one.







The Diamond Chapter of Excellence award is the standard that all Mitsubishi dealers strive. It is the highest standard set by Mitsubishi Motors for customer service in the sales, service and parts departments.



i-MiEV certified dealer. These dealerships are specially trained in the sales and service of the Mitsubishi i-MiEV.




By clicking on the submit button, I agree that: (1) I give Mitsubishi Motors North America, Inc. and its authorized dealerships, permission to contact me about Mitsubishi products, services and promotions at the phone number, email address and/or mailing address I've provided above. (2) I consent to be contacted through text messages and/or through the use of an automated technology. (3) I am not required to sign this agreement or agree to the foregoing as a condition of purchasing any property, goods, or services. (4) I acknowledge that I have read and agree to the Privacy statement.





Submit
        



















We are trying to improve mitsubishicars.com to provide you with the best experience. We would greatly appreciate your help by answering the following three questions.
No
Yes







































Find a Mitsubishi Dealer Near You | Mitsubishi Motors




















































  














 


























VEHICLES



Outlander Sport
Outlander
Lancer
Lancer Evolution
Mirage
Mirage G4
Concept Cars
Certified Pre-Owned


UPCOMING OUTLANDER PHEV						



UPCOMING ECLIPSE CROSS						





CROSSOVERS



Outlander Sport

FROM
$19,7951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Outlander

FROM
$23,4951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





CARS



Lancer

FROM
$17,7951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Lancer Evolution

FROM
$34,4951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Mirage

FROM
$12,9951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Mirage G4

FROM
$13,9951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									







Concept Cars



Certified Pre-Owned


UPCOMING VEHICLES



UPCOMING VEHICLES



OUTLANDER PHEV
        




ECLIPSE CROSS
        




SHOPPING TOOLS





Build and Price										






Search Inventory										






Find a Dealer										








Request a Quote								



Request a Test Drive								



Compare Vehicles								



Certified Pre-Owned								



Get a Brochure								








Special Offers								



Payment Calculator								



Trade-in Appraisal								



Free Equifax Credit Score								



Finance Plans								







Inside Mitsubishi





Who we are										








Engineering Milestones								



Concept Cars								



History								



Company								








Warranty										






Roadside Assistance										







OWNERS





###

Email*



Forgot Password? 
Password*




Submit


 Sign Up








Owner's Home								



My Garage								



Service								



Parts and Accessories								



Support								



Offers								



Pay Online								








Events and Auto Shows								



Mitsubishi Owners Day and Past Events								











FIND A LOCAL DEALER 
Where are the closest Mitsubishi car dealerships near me? Enter your zip, city & state, or dealer below to find out









ZIP
CITY & STATE
DEALER NAME







State
AK
AL
AR
AZ
CA
CO
CT
DC
DE
FL
GA
HI
IA
ID
IL
IN
KS
KY
LA
MA
MD
ME
MI
MN
MO
MS
MT
NC
ND
NE
NH
NJ
NM
NV
NY
OH
OK
OR
PA
RI
SC
SD
TN
TX
UT
VA
VT
WA
WI
WV
WY 




ZIP
City & State
Dealer Name


Submit



Or
USE MY CURRENT LOCATION 


SHOWING 5 CLOSEST LOCATIONS



LIST


MAP











The Diamond Chapter of Excellence award is the standard that all Mitsubishi dealers strive. It is the highest standard set by Mitsubishi Motors for customer service in the sales, service and parts departments.



i-MiEV certified dealer. These dealerships are specially trained in the sales and service of the Mitsubishi i-MiEV.








 Show Itinerary
 Show Directions Map
 Back to Map










01
#
#
#






#
#


 Directions
 Dealer Website 
REQUEST A QUOTE 


















DISCLAIMERS			






1 Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price. Excludes destination/handling, tax, title, license etc. Retailer price, terms and vehicle availability may vary. See your Mitsubishi retailer for details.




















Address*



City*



State*

Select
AK
AL
AR
AZ
CA
CO
CT
DC
DE
FL
GA
HI
IA
ID
IL
IN
KS
KY
LA
MA
MD
ME
MI
MN
MO
MS
MT
NC
ND
NE
NH
NJ
NM
NV
NY
OH
OK
OR
PA
RI
SC
SD
TN
TX
UT
VA
VT
WA
WI
WV
WY 


Zip*


Get Directions















We are trying to improve mitsubishicars.com to provide you with the best experience. We would greatly appreciate your help by answering the following three questions.
No
Yes






































Mitsubishi Car Leasing & More Special Offers | Mitsubishi Motors




















































  



































VEHICLES



Outlander Sport
Outlander
Lancer
Lancer Evolution
Mirage
Mirage G4
Concept Cars
Certified Pre-Owned


UPCOMING OUTLANDER PHEV						



UPCOMING ECLIPSE CROSS						





CROSSOVERS



Outlander Sport

FROM
$19,7951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Outlander

FROM
$23,4951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





CARS



Lancer

FROM
$17,7951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Lancer Evolution

FROM
$34,4951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Mirage

FROM
$12,9951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Mirage G4

FROM
$13,9951




















BUILD YOUR OWN									







Concept Cars



Certified Pre-Owned


UPCOMING VEHICLES



UPCOMING VEHICLES



OUTLANDER PHEV
        




ECLIPSE CROSS
        




SHOPPING TOOLS





Build and Price										






Search Inventory										






Find a Dealer										








Request a Quote								



Request a Test Drive								



Compare Vehicles								



Certified Pre-Owned								



Get a Brochure								








Special Offers								



Payment Calculator								



Trade-in Appraisal								



Free Equifax Credit Score								



Finance Plans								







Inside Mitsubishi





Who we are										








Engineering Milestones								



Concept Cars								



History								



Company								








Warranty										






Roadside Assistance										







OWNERS





###

Email*



Forgot Password? 
Password*




Submit


 Sign Up








Owner's Home								



My Garage								



Service								



Parts and Accessories								



Support								



Offers								



Pay Online								








Events and Auto Shows								



Mitsubishi Owners Day and Past Events								
















									100TH ANNIVERSARY SALES EVENT


									SPECIAL OFFERS

















Select Your Model
View All




















Outlander















Outlander Sport















Mirage















Mirage G4















Lancer















Lancer Evolution











Showing -- Offers for All Vehicles near





to see offers near you
please enter a new one


Filters 






Filter Your Offers: 




Filter By Offer Type
					








CASH







APR







LEASE







OTHER









Filter By Model Year
						





 
2017





 
2016





 
2015





Clear All Filters




Clear All
        









Sorry, no matches found. Try increasing your search radius or contacting your local dealer directly.
Sign up for our monthly newsletters filled with special offers, events and product info.



SIGN UP
        










GLOBAL OFFERS


ANY VEHICLE
CASH

Up to $750 Military Rebate
Your investment in this country is to be commended, and in recognition of your efforts, Mitsubishi Motors is offering you up to a $750 rebate on select models.
Mitsubishi recognizes the dedication and achievements of the hardworking women and men of the military. Your investment in this country is to be commended, and in recognition of your efforts, Mitsubishi Motors is offering you a $500 rebate on select models. Important restrictions and rules apply. See your participating Dealer for the program details. Thank you! Offer valid from 04/01/2017 through 04/02/2018.Ally Financial is also offering customers who qualify for the Mitsubishi $500 Military Rebate a matching $250 Down Payment Assistance (DPA) for purchase transactions or matching $250 Ally SmartLease Capitalized Cost Reduction Allowance (CCRA) for SmartLease contracts.  Purchase term may not exceed 72 months, lease term may not exceed 60 months.  Contract must be signed between 07/06/17 and 10/02/2017.  Not available with financing under the Ally Buyers Choice Program or with financing that includes a balloon payment.  May not be combined with any other Ally offer.  See a participating dealer to see if you qualify and for additional details. 



ANY VEHICLE
CASH

There is no better time than now to buy a new Mitsubishi! 
Buy your new MY2016 - MY2017 Mitsubishi between 7/6/17 and 9/5/17 and make no payments for 90 days when you finance through your dealer and Ally Financial. 
With approved credit, customers have an option to make no payments for 90 days.  Available to well qualified customers who finance an eligible vehicle through a Mitsubishi Dealer and Ally Financial.  Finance charges begin to accrue on the date you sign the Retail Installment Sale Contract at the Annual Percentage Rate (APR) disclosed in the contract.  May not be combined with other Ally financing offers. Offer not valid on Ally Buyer's Choice or Ally Balloon Advantage contracts. Subject to maximum term limits. Dealer participation required. Not available to Pennsylvania residents, see your dealer for details. Must take retail delivery by 9/5/17.







DISCLAIMERS			






† Negotiate your best price and get up to $2,000 in factory rebates ($2,000 on a new 2017 Outlander, 2017 Outlander Sport, 2017 Mirage G4, and $1,500 on a new 2017 Mirage & 2017 Lancer). Factory rebate may not combine with Special APR or Special Lease. Or get up to 0.0% APR for 72 months PLUS $500 APR Customer Rebate (72 monthly payments of $13.89 per $1,000 financed at 0.0% APR) on 2017 Outlander Sport, or up to 0.0% APR for 72 months (72 monthly payments of $13.89 per $1,000 financed at 0.0% APR) on 2017 Outlander, or up to 0.0% APR for 48 months PLUS $500 APR Customer Rebate (48 monthly payments of $20.83 per $1,000 financed at 0.0% APR) on 2017 Lancer, or up to 0.0% APR for 48 months PLUS $750 APR Customer Rebate (48 monthly payments of $20.83 per $1,000 financed at 0.0% APR) on 2017 Mirage and 2017 Mirage G4 available through Ally Financial, subject to approved credit and insurance. Some customers will not qualify. Price, terms and vehicle availability may vary. The Special APR offer may not combine with factory rebate. See your participating dealer for details. Offer valid from 07/06/2017 through 07/31/2017.
1 Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price. Excludes destination/handling, tax, title, license etc. Retailer price, terms and vehicle availability may vary. See your Mitsubishi retailer for details.



















SIGN UP FOR UPDATES
                        


Get notified via: 


SMS Phone Number


OR

or Email Adress





Add your Zip Code



Terms & Conditions

Send me communications via text message. Standard text messaging and data rates may apply.




SIGN UP
        





Error submiting form



THANKS FOR SIGNING UP.
You're all set.




By clicking on the submit button, I agree that: (1) I give Mitsubishi Motors North America, Inc. and its authorized dealerships, permission to contact me about Mitsubishi products, services and promotions at the phone number, email address and/or mailing address I've provided above. (2) I consent to be contacted through text messages and/or through the use of automated technology. (3) I am not required to sign this agreement or agree to the foregoing as a condition of purchasing any property, goods, or services.  (4) I acknowledge that I have read and agree to the Privacy statement.        














We are trying to improve mitsubishicars.com to provide you with the best experience. We would greatly appreciate your help by answering the following three questions.
No
Yes







































2016 Outlander / Build & Price Trims, Packages & Accessories / Mitsubishi Motors










































  














 

















Outlander









VEHICLES



Outlander Sport
Outlander
Lancer
Lancer Evolution
Mirage
Mirage G4
Concept Cars
Certified Pre-Owned


UPCOMING OUTLANDER PHEV						



UPCOMING ECLIPSE CROSS						





CROSSOVERS



Outlander Sport

FROM
$19,79513




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Outlander

FROM
$23,49513




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





CARS



Lancer

FROM
$17,79513




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Lancer Evolution

FROM
$34,49513




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Mirage

FROM
$12,99513




















BUILD YOUR OWN									





Mirage G4

FROM
$13,99513




















BUILD YOUR OWN									







Concept Cars



Certified Pre-Owned


UPCOMING VEHICLES



UPCOMING VEHICLES



OUTLANDER PHEV
        




ECLIPSE CROSS
        




SHOPPING TOOLS





Build and Price										






Search Inventory										






Find a Dealer										








Request a Quote								



Request a Test Drive								



Compare Vehicles								



Certified Pre-Owned								



Get a Brochure								








Special Offers								



Payment Calculator								



Trade-in Appraisal								



Free Equifax Credit Score								



Finance Plans								







Inside Mitsubishi





Who we are										








Engineering Milestones								



Concept Cars								



History								



Company								








Warranty										






Roadside Assistance										







OWNERS





###

Email*



Forgot Password? 
Password*




Submit


 Sign Up








Owner's Home								



My Garage								



Service								



Parts and Accessories								



Support								



Offers								



Pay Online								








Events and Auto Shows								



Mitsubishi Owners Day and Past Events								




















 See 360 View

Build & Price
Your 2016 Outlander





MSRP as Built
$229959



As Low As
$0/MO10


Calculate Your Payments


MSRP $ 229959



OPTIONS

TRIM
edit


Base MSRP
#
13
 


COLORS
edit


#
Included



FACTORY PACKAGES
edit




ACCESSORIES
edit




WARRANTY
Included


10-year/ 100,000-mile Powertrain Limited Warranty 8


DESTINATION AND HANDLING FEES
$94012







Buy For
$0/MO10


Lease For
$0/MO11











 Step 1 of 5: Trim Levels 





 Next: Colors





Trim Levels
Colors
Factory Packages
Accessories
Summary

























































































































































                    Exterior
                



                    INTERIOR
                











NEXT: COLORS
        

SELECT A TRIM LEVEL
 CHOOSE WHICH LEVEL OF FEATURES BEST SUITS YOU




ES

CONTINUOUSLY VARIABLE TRANSMISSION
Starting at $22,99513
 SELECTED
SELECT

See Details
Hide Details


18-inch two-tone alloy wheels
7-passenger seating
Heated side-view mirrors
LED positioning lights
LED Rear combination tail lights
FUSE Hands-free Link System® with USB/iPod® port
Automatic climate control
Auto-off halogen headlights





ES
								S-AWC
				
CONTINUOUSLY VARIABLE TRANSMISSION
Starting at $24,99513
 SELECTED
SELECT

See Details
Hide Details


18-inch two-tone alloy wheels
7-passenger seating
Heated side-view mirrors
LED positioning lights
LED Rear combination tail lights







SE

CONTINUOUSLY VARIABLE TRANSMISSION
Starting at $23,99513
 SELECTED
SELECT

See Details
Hide Details


Rearview camera
FAST-Key passive entry system with panic alarm feature
Heated front seats
6.1-inch touchscreen display w/ rearview camera
One-touch Start/Stop (OSS) engine switch
Front Dual-zone climate control
Fog lights with chrome accents
Color-keyed power side-view mirrors with turn indicators





SE
								S-AWC
				
CONTINUOUSLY VARIABLE TRANSMISSION
Starting at $25,99513
 SELECTED
SELECT

See Details
Hide Details


Super All-Wheel Control (S-AWC) 
FAST-Key passive entry system with panic alarm feature
6.1-inch touchscreen display w/ rearview camera
Heated front seats
One-touch Start/Stop (OSS) engine switch
Front Dual-zone climate control
Fog lights with chrome accents







SEL

CONTINUOUSLY VARIABLE TRANSMISSION
Starting at $24,99513
 SELECTED
SELECT

See Details
Hide Details


Leather seating surfaces
8-way Power adjustable driver's seat with seat back pocket
FAST-Key passive entry system with panic alarm feature
6.1-inch touchscreen display w/ rearview camera
Heated front seats
One-touch Start/Stop (OSS) engine switch
Black roof rails





SEL
								S-AWC
				
CONTINUOUSLY VARIABLE TRANSMISSION
Starting at $26,99513
 SELECTED
SELECT

See Details
Hide Details


Super All-Wheel Control (S-AWC) 
Leather seating surfaces
8-way Power adjustable driver's seat with seat back pocket
FAST-Key passive entry system with panic alarm feature
6.1-inch touchscreen display w/ rearview camera
Heated front seats
Black roof rails







GT
								S-AWC
				
"SPORTRONIC"™ 6-SPD AUTO TRANSMISSION
Starting at $30,99513
 SELECTED
SELECT

See Details
Hide Details


Power glass sunroof with tilt & slide and one-touch open/close switch
710-watt Rockford-Fosgate® premium sound system with 9 speakers including 10-inch dual-voice coil subwoofer with Punch Control®, DTS® Neural Surround, PremiDIA-WIDE surround, and Dolby® Volume
Super All-Wheel Control (S-AWC) 
LED headlights
Power remote liftgate
Auto-dimming rearview mirror with Homelink®  universal garage door opener
Windshield wiper de-icer
Power folding side-view mirrors







NEXT: COLORS
        











Standard Features

7-passenger seating
Super All-Wheel Control (S-AWC) 
LED headlights
Power remote liftgate
FUSE Hands-free Link System® with USB/iPod® port
18-inch two-tone alloy wheels










All Additional Features










YOU'VE CHANGED YOUR TRIM SELECTION:

RESET YOUR SELECTIONS?
Selecting a new trim package will reset all of your selections. Do you want to continue?


YES - choose the new trim package
NO - keep the previous selection







NEXT: FACTORY PACKAGES
        

Select A Color
SEE WHICH COLOR YOU LIKE BEST

EXTERIOR 
INTERIOR 
Pick a color:


Exterior
Interior


NEXT: FACTORY PACKAGES









 is only available as part of the  Factory Packages.





CANCEL
ACCEPT






NEXT: ACCESSORIES
        

ADD A FACTORY PACKAGE
CHOOSE FROM THESE FACTORY-INSTALLED PACKAGE OPTIONS








NEXT: ACCESSORIES
        










 Factory Package is only available with the  interior color/fabric.
CANCEL
ACCEPT






NEXT: SUMMARY
        

ADD AN ACCESSORIES PACKAGE
HERE ARE SOME POPULAR OPTIONS TO ADD TO YOUR MITSUBISHI






ADD ACCESSORIES
CUSTOMIZE YOUR VEHICLE TO FIT YOUR LIFESTYLE






NEXT: SUMMARY
        








                Your 
                2016  
Outlander                


















                        PRINT


                        EMAIL








See a Map
                    



Get Directions
                    



More Dealers Near You
                    



Similar Cars Near You
                    









MSRP AS BUILT


                        $22995
9








                             We're sorry,
the payment calculator is temporarily unavailable.
You can check our most recent Special Offers located under shopping tools or with your local Mitsubishi dealer. 
We'll be back online shortly.
                        



BUY FOR


                            $0
/MO
10

For 0 Months at x.x% apr



LEASE FOR


                            $0
/MO
11


                        For 0 Months
                        
                        $0 TOTAL DOWN + SECURITY DEPOSIT + FIRST MONTH PAYMENT DUE ON LEASE.
                        







CALCULATE YOUR PAYMENTS







go to top                    







OPTIONS

TRIM
edit


Base MSRP
#
13
 


COLORS
edit


#
Included



FACTORY PACKAGES
edit




ACCESSORIES
edit




WARRANTY
Included


10-year/ 100,000-mile Powertrain Limited Warranty 8


DESTINATION AND HANDLING FEES
$94012








Local Dealer









 


















CONTACT DEALER
        





Get Directions
More Dealers near you








0 SIMILAR
				 NEAR YOU 


						Results for 
						you

 
					Searching 
					5 dealerships. 
					VIEW 
						




Sort Results

Distance from Dealer
Price: Low - High
Price: High - Low















Sort Results

Distance from Dealer
Price: Low - High
Price: High - Low



 Please select no more than two vehicles to continue. 
*Please select a vehicle to continue. 




REQUEST A QUOTE
        




An error occur while updating the results. Please adjust the filters of your search.






GO TO TOP
        




REQUEST A QUOTE
        
















THESE VEHICLES MATCH YOUR SELECTION






SIMILAR VEHICLES: These vehicles may only match  some of the features that you selected








STILL NOT SURE?
We can help you find the perfect Mitsubishi.
 Find it for meFind it for me


Request a Quote



SEE ALL MATCHING INVENTORY
        





Please select no more than two vehicles to continue.












Quick Quote 

















The Diamond Chapter of Excellence award is the standard that all Mitsubishi dealers strive. It is the highest standard set by Mitsubishi Motors for customer service in the sales, service and parts departments.



i-MiEV certified dealer. These dealerships are specially trained in the sales and service of the Mitsubishi i-MiEV.







                    First Name*





                    Last Name*





                    Email*





Street Address Line 1                




Street Address Line 2                





Phone                    




Mobile
Work
Home






Terms & Conditions

Send me communications about upcoming events and promotions via text message.Standard text messaging and data rates may apply.




Phone                        *Mobile phone needed



Mobile




By clicking on the submit button, I agree that: (1) I give Mitsubishi Motors North America, Inc. and its authorized dealerships, permission to contact me about Mitsubishi products, services and promotions at the phone number, email address and/or mailing address I've provided above. (2) I consent to be contacted through text messages and/or through the use of an automated technology. (3) I am not required to sign this agreement or agree to the foregoing as a condition of purchasing any property, goods, or services. (4) I acknowledge that I have read and agree to the Privacy statement.

Submit
















Would you like to keep these selections on the inventory page?


Yes
No















Share your summary
Email your vehicle summary to yourself or share it with friends. Don't worry; we won't track what you
say or who you're sending it to.




                                Your Name*





                                Your Email*






Send to myself                            



Recipient's Email                            




                                Message*



SEND 

















Dealerships 














Searching 


 5 
 6 
 7 
 8 
 9 
 10 
 11 
 12 


 dealerships.








The Diamond Chapter of Excellence award is the standard that all Mitsubishi dealers strive. It is the highest standard set by Mitsubishi Motors for customer service in the sales, service and parts departments.



i-MiEV certified dealer. These dealerships are specially trained in the sales and service of the Mitsubishi i-MiEV.













SPECIAL OFFER FOR

Zip


















DISCLAIMERS			






1 ©2015 Sirius XM Radio Inc. Sirius, XM and all related marks and logos are trademarks of Sirius XM Radio Inc. All rights reserved.
2 Airbags are part of a Supplemental Restraint System (SRS). To decrease the risk of injury from a deploying airbag, always wear your seat belt, sit upright in the middle of the seat and do not lean against the door. Always place children 12 and under in the rear seat and use appropriate child restraints. Never place a rear-facing infant restraint in the front seat. See your owner's manual and the instructions provided with your child restraint for additional information.
3 EPA mileage estimate. Actual mileage may vary.
4 Safety is a two-way street. It requires your attention and cooperation. Please remember to fasten your seat belt, drive responsibly and obey all traffic laws.
5 Adaptive Cruise Control is not a collision avoidance system or an automatic driving system. It is designed to use only limited braking and is never a substitute for safe and careful driving. Never rely solely on the Adaptive Cruise Control system.
6 Forward Collision Mitigation is designed to help avoid or reduce the crash speed in certain frontal collisions. It is not a substitute for safe and careful driving. Under certain circumstances, the system may not operate or may not detect a frontal vehicle correctly.
7 Lane Departure Warning is designed to read lane markers under certain conditions. It is not a collision avoidance system and is not a substitute for safe and careful driving.
8 All coverage terms are from the original in-service dates, and are applicable only to the original owner of new, retailed models purchased from an authorized Mitsubishi dealer. Subsequent owners receive the balance of the New Vehicle Limited Warranty of 5 years/60,000 miles. See retailer for limited warranty and roadside assistance terms and conditions.
9 Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price including destination and handling (D&H). Add $125 for D&H deliveries to Alaska and Hawaii (taxes, title and registration fees are extra). Retailer price, terms and vehicle availability may vary. See your Mitsubishi retailer for details. 

10 The information provided here is an estimate, for illustration purposes only and is subject to change. You may not be able to finance your vehicle at this rate. Calculation displayed is after applying customer lease cash, if applicable. See dealer for details

11 The information provided here is an estimate, for illustration purposes only and is subject to change. You may not be able to finance your vehicle at this rate. Calculation displayed is after applying customer lease cash, if applicable. See dealer for details.
12 In Alaska and Hawaii an extra $125 is due.
13 Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price. Excludes destination/handling, tax, title, license etc. Retailer price, terms and vehicle availability may vary. See your Mitsubishi retailer for details.





























Calculate your payment






MSRP AS BUILT
1



 MSRP 1











Buy
Lease

Leasing is not available for this vehicle See lease offers available on other vehicles






BUY FOR AS LOW AS


2 PER MONTH FOR  MONTHS
                            





Fill in the fields below to see your customized monthly payments.






Estimated Amount Financed
(includes available offers and incentives)







Down-Payment

10% of MSRP



Trade-in Value




Balance owed on Trade-In







Term (in months):






Interest Rate3:




Alternative Rate




I have alternative financing 
Back to Mitsubishi Supported Rate 






LEASE FOR AS LOW AS


4 PER MONTH FOR  MONTHS
                            





Fill in the fields below to see your customized monthly payments.






Due at Lease Signing5
(includes security deposit and 1st month payment)







Down-Payment:




Trade-In Value




Balance owed on Trade-In:







Annual Contract Miles6:






Term (in months)






















BACK TO PAYMENT CALCULATOR
        




BUY FOR AS LOW AS 
2 PER MONTH FOR  MONTHS
            

Select
Selected



LEASE FOR AS LOW AS
4 PER MONTH FOR  MONTHS
            

Select
Selected




Congratulations! You are one step closer to driving the vehicle of your choice. Simply fill out the form to get a quote from your local dealers.





SELECT ONE OR TWO DEALERS
Please select no more than two dealers to continue.






Next
        





TELL US HOW TO REACH YOU


*Required Fields 


                                    First Name*





                                    Last Name*





Street Address                                




Apt. or Suite                                


Method of Contact


                                    Email*



Please provide a phone number so we can contact you with information regarding your quote.



Phone                                    




Mobile
Work
Home






Terms & Conditions

Send me communications about upcoming events and promotions via text message.Standard text messaging and data rates may apply.




Phone                                        *Mobile phone needed



Mobile




By clicking on the submit button, I agree that: (1) I give Mitsubishi Motors North America, Inc. and its authorized dealerships, permission to contact me about Mitsubishi products, services and promotions at the phone number, email address and/or mailing address I've provided above. (2) I consent to be contacted through text messages and/or through the use of an automated technology. (3) I am not required to sign this agreement or agree to the foregoing as a condition of purchasing any property, goods, or services. (4) I acknowledge that I have read and agree to the Privacy statement.





Submit





















1 Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price including destination and handling (D&H). Add $125 for D&H deliveries to Alaska and Hawaii (taxes, title and registration fees are extra). Retailer price, terms and vehicle availability may vary. See your Mitsubishi retailer for details. 

2 The information provided here is an estimate, for illustration purposes only and is subject to change. You may not be able to finance your vehicle at this rate. Calculation displayed is after applying customer lease cash, if applicable. See dealer for details

3 The interest rate is based on the "term duration" selected and available compatible cash incentives. Some customers will not qualify for this rate. The rate may vary.  See dealer for details. 

4 The information provided here is an estimate, for illustration purposes only and is subject to change. You may not be able to finance your vehicle at this rate. Calculation displayed is after applying customer lease cash, if applicable. See dealer for details.
5 The amount customer will pay at or prior to lease signing (or delivery of the vehicle). The amount due at signing, after application of all qualifying offers, includes down payment, security deposit, and first month's payment (taxes, title and registration fees are extra).
6 Customer is responsible to pay for all mileage ($0.20 per mile) exceeding the annual contracted amount.


Disclaimers  





















Thank You
A dealer will be in contact with you shortly.










LET THE FUN BEGIN
Enter your ZIP code so we can provide you with the most relevant special offers and up-to-date inventory information.
Please enter a valid Zip.


Continue 

USE MY CURRENT LOCATION 



Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price Disclaimer: Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price including destination and handling (D&H). Add $125 for D&H deliveries to Alaska and Hawaii (taxes, title and registration fees are extra). Retailer price, terms and vehicle availability may vary. See your Mitsubishi retailer for details. 
Accesories Disclaimer: Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price (installation costs not included).
Payment Calculator Disclaimers:
APR: The information provided here is an estimate, for illustration purposes only and is subject to change. You may not be able to finance your vehicle at this rate. See dealer for details.
Lease: The information provided here is an estimate, for illustration purposes only and is subject to change. You may not be able to Lease your vehicle at this rate. See dealer for details.
Due at Lease signing Disclaimer: The amount customer will pay at or prior to lease signing (or delivery of the vehicle). The amount due at signing, after application of all qualifying offers, includes down payment, security deposit, and first month's payment (taxes, title and registration fees are extra). 
Interest Rate Disclaimer: The interest rate is based on the "term duration" selected and available compatible cash incentives. Some customers will not qualify for this rate. The rate may vary.  See dealer for details.
Annual Contract Miles Disclaimer: Lease Mileage Disclaimer:  Customer is responsible to pay for all mileage ($0.20 per mile) exceeding the annual contracted amount.
Warranty Disclaimer: At Mitsubishi, we are so confident in the quality, reliability and durability of the cars we build that we back our passenger cars and sport utility vehicles with very extensive warranties. This list is headed by a 10-year/100,000 mile Powertrain Limited Warranty, a 5-year/60,000 mile fully transferable New Vehicle Limited Warranty and 5-years/Unlimited miles Roadside Assistance (i-MiEV comes with 3-years/36,000 miles Roadside Assistance). All Mitsubishi models come with a 7-year/100,000 mile Anti-Corrosion/Perforation Limited Warranty. Excludes Lancer Evolution, Lancer Ralliart and i-MiEV, which come with a transferable Powertrain Limited. Warranty of 5 years/60,000 miles and a transferable New Vehicle Limited Warranty of 3-years/36,000 miles. 10-year/1 00,000-mile Powertrain Limited Warranty applies only to the original owner of new, retailed models purchased from an authorized Mitsubishi dealer. Subsequent owners receive the balance of the New Vehicle Limited Warranty of 5 years/60,000 miles. See retailer for limited warranty terms and conditions.










We are trying to improve mitsubishicars.com to provide you with the best experience. We would greatly appreciate your help by answering the following three questions.
No
Yes




































